Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2471.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 408.17 heading, (a), (b), (c), (d) and (g) of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, added March 27, 2026 (P.L.182, No.8), are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 408.17. [Philadelphia] Pennsylvania 250 Permits.--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 (a) A restaurant, hotel, retail dispenser, brewery, distillery, limited distillery or limited winery licensee that is located in a city of the first class or a municipality that has approved an ordinance under subsection (g.1) may apply to the board for a [Philadelphia] Pennsylvania 250 permit subject to the fees, limitations and privileges provided for in this section.(b) An application for a permit under this section shall:(1) be filed with the board no less than [thirty] fifteen days prior to the date on which the applicant intends to begin operating under subsection (e);(2) include an application fee of five hundred dollars ($500), which shall be deposited by the board into The State Stores Fund;(3) include confirmation that the licensee has completed a specialized program offered by a city of the first class, if located in a city of the first class, or the board, if located in a municipality that has approved an ordinance under subsection (g.1), to provide training for nighttime safety for patrons and employees; and(4) be posted on the board's publicly accessible Internet website, including the name and address of the licensed establishment.* * *(c) The board may not issue a permit under this section if:(1) [A protest is filed with the board by a city of the first class to the issuance of the permit.] The municipality in which the licensee is located files a protest with the board objecting to the issuance of the permit.(2) The license of an applicant is:(i) subject to a pending objection by the Director of the 20260HB2471PN3304 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bureau of Licensing or the board under section 470(a.1), until the matter is decided;(ii) suspended under section 1799.6-E of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as "The Fiscal Code";(iii) subject to a conditional licensing agreement resulting from renewal proceedings under section 470; or(iv) subject to a pending license suspension under section 471.(d) A denial of a permit by the board under subsection (c) shall not be appealable. Any disputes between the [city of the first class] municipality and an applicant or other interested parties regarding protests filed under subsection (c)(1) shall be resolved between those parties and shall not involve the board.* * *(g) The board may immediately revoke a permit issued under this section if the licensee holding the permit operates outside the scope of the permit as set forth in this section or otherwise abuses the privileges granted by the permit. The enforcement bureau, a [city of the first class] municipality with a Pennsylvania 250 permit holder in its jurisdiction or a local law enforcement agency may make a report to the board requesting the revocation of the permit.(g.1) A municipality that wishes to allow licensees to apply for Pennsylvania 250 permits shall adopt an ordinance declaring eligibility for a Pennsylvania 250 permit under this section. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require cities of the first class to pass an ordinance in order to become eligible for permits under this section.* * *20260HB2471PN3304 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2471PN3304 - 4 - 1